Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.590

Election assistance and clearinghouse program.

The secretary of state shall establish within the elections division an election assistance and clearinghouse program, which shall provide regular communication between the secretary of state, local election officials, and major and minor political parties regarding newly enacted elections legislation, relevant judicial decisions affecting the administration of elections, and applicable attorney general opinions, and which shall respond to inquiries from elections administrators, political parties, and others regarding election information. This section does not empower the secretary of state to offer legal advice or opinions, but the secretary may discuss the construction or interpretation of election law, case law, or legal opinions from the attorney general or other competent legal authority.

[ 2003 c 111 s 157. Prior: 1992 c 163 s 11. Formerly RCW 29.60.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 163 ss 5-13: See note following RCW 29A.04.530.